Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.140

Scrap metal license—Renewal—Surrender of license.

A license issued on the scrap metal license application remains in force until suspended or revoked and may be renewed annually upon reapplication and upon payment of the required fee. A licensee who fails or neglects to renew the license before the assigned expiration date shall pay the fee for an original scrap metal license as provided in this chapter.

Whenever a scrap metal processor, recycler, or supplier ceases to do business as such or the license has been suspended or revoked, the licensee shall immediately surrender the license to the department of licensing.

[ 2013 c 322 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: See notes following RCW 19.290.100.